New Jersey, session 221, A2633.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer shall be allowed to deduct from gross income the amount of charitable contributions made to a qualified New Jersey-based charitable organization in the taxable year equal to the amount that is allowable as a deduction from federal adjusted gross income for the federal taxable year pursuant to section 170 of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.170). b.    For the purposes of this section, qualified New Jersey-based charitable organization means a charitable organization that is registered pursuant to the "Charitable Registration and Investigation Act," P.L.1994, c.16 (C.45:17A-18 et seq.), or an organization that is exempt from the registration requirements of that act pursuant to section 9 of P.L.1994, c.16 (C.45:17A-26), and that maintains an office, employs persons, and provides services in this State. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to charitable contributions made in taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 next following the date of enactment.